Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-32,179
Unfair trade and claims settlement practices laws; applicability.

The Unfair Insurance Trade Practices Act and the Unfair Insurance Claims Settlement Practices Act shall apply to health maintenance organizations except to the extent that the director determines the nature of health maintenance organizations renders application of either act clearly inappropriate.

Laws 1990, LB 1136, § 88;

Laws 1991, LB 234, § 32.

Unfair Insurance Claims Settlement Practices Act, see section 44-1536.

Unfair Insurance Trade Practices Act, see section 44-1521.